cs: Design plováku: Bobber; Bublina; Doutník; Controller; Drift/Slider; Pellet waggler; Tužka; Pole; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Ostatní
nl: Dobber ontwerp: Dobber; Waterkogel; Sigaar; Controller; Drift/Slider; Pellet waggler; Pen; Vaste hengel; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Overige
sk-SK: Dizajn plaváka: Guľatý; Bublina; Cigareta; Kontrolér; Na drift / slider; Pellet waggler; Ceruzka; Na bič; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Iné
en: Float design: Bobber; Bubble; Cigar; Controller; Drift/Slider; Pellet waggler; Pencil; Pole; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Other
es: Diseño de flotadores: Boya; Burbuja; Cigarro; Controlador; Deriva/deslizador; Pellet waggler; Lápiz; Polo; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Otro
zh-CN: 浮漂设计: 圆浮漂; 气泡形; 雪茄形; 控线漂; 游动漂/滑漂; 颗粒钓摇摆浮漂; 铅笔形; 立漂; 棒形/雅芳漂; 摇摆浮漂; 其他
zh-TW: 釣魚浮標設計: 圓浮標; 水球浮標; 雪茄型; 控制型; 漂流/滑動型; 顆粒餌長浮標; 鉛筆型; 長桿型; 棒型/Avon 型; 長浮標; 其他
bg-BG: Дизайн на плувката: Бобър; Булдо; Пура; Контролер; Слайдър / за дрифт; Пелет ваглер; Молив; За щека; Стик / Ейвън; Ваглер; Друго
fr: Type de flotteur: Bouchon; Bulle; Cigare; Contrôleur; Dérive / Coulissant; Waggler à pellets; Crayon; Au coup; Stick / Avon; Waggler; Autre
vi: Thiết kế phao: Phao tròn; Phao bóng nước; Phao hình xì gà; Phao điều khiển; Phao trôi/trượt; Phao waggler câu viên; Phao bút chì; Phao đài; Phao que/Avon; Phao waggler; Khác
th: ดีไซน์ลอยน้ำ: ทุ่นลอยตกปลา; ทุ่นฟองน้ำ; ทุ่นซิการ์; ทุ่นคอนโทรลเลอร์; ทุ่นลอย/สไลเดอร์; ทุ่นเพลเลทแว็กเลอร์; ทุ่นดินสอ; ทุ่นชิงหลิว; ทุ่นสติ๊ก/เอวอน; ทุ่นแว็กเลอร์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Design da boia: Bobber; Bolha; Charuto; Controlador; Deriva/Deslizante; Pellet waggler; Lápis; Vara; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Outro
sv: Flötesdesign: Rundflöte; Bubbla; Cigarr; Controller; Driv/Glid; Pellet waggler; Penna; Toppknut; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Övrigt
ko: 낚시찌 유형: 바버; 버블; 시가; 컨트롤러; 드리프트/슬라이더; 펠릿 와글러; 연필형; 폴형; 스틱/에이번; 와글러; 기타
fi: Kellukkeen suunnittelu: Pallokoho; Kuplakoho; Sikarikoho; Ohjauskoho; Ajokoho/liukukoho; Pellet waggler; Kynäkoho; Onkikoho; Virtavesikoho; Waggler; Muu
ja: フロート設計: ボバー; バブル; シガー; コントローラー; ドリフト/スライダー; ペレットワグラー; ペンシル; ポール; スティック/エイボン; ワグラー; その他
hr-HR: Dizajn plutača: Bobber; Vodena kugla; Oblik cigare; Kontroler; Klizeći; Pellet waggler; Oblik olovke; Za štek; Stick / Avon; Waggler; Ostalo
da: Flydedesign: Prop; Boble; Cigar; Controller; Driv/glide; Pellet waggler; Blyant; Stang; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Andet
pt-PT: design flutuante: Boia redonda; Bolha; Charuto; Controlador; Deriva/deslizante; Pellet waggler; Lápis; Vara; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Outro
ru: Конструкция поплавка: Боббер; Водоналивной; Сигара; Контроллер; Дрифтер/слайдер; Пеллет-вагглер; Карандаш; Штекерный; Стик/эйвон; Вагглер; Другое
de: Design der Angelpose: Bobber; Wasserkugel; Zigarre; Controller; Drift/Slider; Pellet-Waggler; Stiftpose; Stipp-Pose; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Sonstiges
it: Progettazione del galleggiante: Galleggiante a pallina; Galleggiante a bolla d'acqua; A siluro; Controller; Scorrevole/da passata; Pellet waggler; A penna; A goccia; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Altro
hu: Úszó kialakítása: Gömbalakú úszó; Vizesgömb; Szivar; Controller; Drift/Csúszó; Pellet waggler; Ceruza; Rakós; Folyóvízi (Stick/Avon); Waggler; Egyéb
tr: Şamandıra tasarımı: Tombul şamandıra; Su topu; Puro; Kontrolör; Akıntı/Kayar; Pelet waggler; Kalem; Kamış; Çubuk/Avon; Waggler; Diğer
el: Σχεδιασμός φελλού: Φελλός (Bobber); Φούσκα; Πούρο; Controller; Drift/Slider; Pellet waggler; Μολύβι; Pole; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Άλλο
pl: Konstrukcja spławika: Bobber; Kula wodna; Cygaro; Controller; Przelotowy; Pellet waggler; Ołówek; Do tyczki; Stick / Avon; Waggler; Inny
sl-SI: Zasnova plovca: Okrogli plovec; Vodna kroglica; Cigarasti plovec; Kontrolni plovec; Drseči plovec; Waggler za pelete; Svinčnikasti plovec; Plovec za polagalko; Paličasti plovec / Avon; Waggler; Drugo
ro-RO: Designul plutei: Plută sferică (bobber); Plută bulă; Plută trabuc; Plută controller; Derivă/Culisantă; Pellet waggler; Plută creion; Plută pentru rubeziană; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Altele
nb: Flytedesign: Kuledupp; Bobledupp; Sigardupp; Kontrollerdupp; Glidedupp; Pellet waggler; Pennedupp; Dupp til toppknytt; Stick/Avon; Waggler; Annet
lt-LT: Plūdės dizainas: Apvali plūdė („Bobber“); Burbulas; Cigaro formos; Valdomoji („Controller“); Slenkanti („Drift / Slider“); Granulių „Waggler“; Pieštuko formos; Stulpo formos; Lazdelė / „Avon“; „Waggler“; Kita